test/src/morphology/V-ngadjimzj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - ӈадимзь: # Verb 'to appear' Type 14-A (even-syllable stem) - partial paradigm
     ӈадимзь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: ӈадимядмʼ
     ӈадимзь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: ӈадимян
     ӈадимзь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈадимя
     ӈадимзь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: ӈадимяниʼ
     ӈадимзь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: ӈадимядиʼ
     ӈадимзь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈадимяхаʼ
     ӈадимзь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: ӈадимяваˮ
     ӈадимзь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: ӈадимядаˮ
     ӈадимзь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈадимяˮ
     ӈадимзь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: ӈадимядамзь
     ӈадимзь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: ӈадимянась
     ӈадимзь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈадимясь
     ӈадимзь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: ӈадимянинзь
     ӈадимзь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: ӈадимядинзь
     ӈадимзь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈадимяханзь
     ӈадимзь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: ӈадимяваць
     ӈадимзь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: ӈадимядаць
     ӈадимзь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈадимяць
     
     ӈадимзь+V+IV+InfImprf: ӈадима  
     ӈадимзь+V+IV+InfPrf: ӈадивоˮма  
     ӈадимзь+V+IV+PrcImprf: ӈадимда
     ӈадимзь+V+IV+PrcPrf: ӈадимы
     ӈадимзь+V+IV+PrcFut: ӈадиманда   
     ӈадимзь+V+IV+PrcNeg: ӈадимадавэй
     ӈадимзь+V+IV+Ger: ӈадимзь 
     ӈадимзь+V+IV+GerFin: ӈадиманзь      
     ӈадимзь+V+IV+Subord+Abs: ӈадимбˮ
     ӈадимзь+V+IV+Evas+Abs: ӈадимоӈгад
     ӈадимзь+V+IV+ConNeg: ӈадивˮ
     ӈадимзь+V+IV+Fut+ConNeg: ӈадимдˮ
